Connecticut, session 2026, HB05451.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 53a-217b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of possession of a weapon on school grounds
when, knowing that such person is not licensed or privileged to do so,
such person possesses a firearm or deadly weapon, as defined in section
53a-3, (1) in or on the real property comprising a public or private
elementary or secondary school, or (2) at a school-sponsored activity as
defined in subsection (h) of section 10-233a.
(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to
the otherwise lawful possession of a firearm (1) by a person for use in a
program approved by school officials in or on such school property or
at such school-sponsored activity, (2) by a person in accordance with an
agreement entered into between school officials and such person or such
person's employer, (3) by a peace officer, as defined in subdivision (9) of
section 53a-3, while engaged in the performance of such peace officer's
official duties, [or] (4) by a person while traversing such school property
for the purpose of gaining access to public or private lands open to
hunting or for other lawful purposes, provided such firearm is not
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5451
loaded and the entry on such school property is permitted by the local
or regional board of education, or (5) by a police officer certified
pursuant to section 7-294d.
(c) Possession of a weapon on school grounds is a class D felony.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 53a-217b
PS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2